Washington statutes.
RCW 43.121.100

Contributions, grants, gifts—Depository for and disbursement and expenditure control of moneys received—Children's trust fund.

Contributions, grants, or gifts in cash or otherwise, including funds generated by the sale of "heirloom" birth certificates under chapter 70.58A RCW from persons, associations, or corporations and funds generated through the issuance of the "Keep Kids Safe" license plate under chapter 46.18 RCW, shall be deposited in a depository approved by the state treasurer to be known as the children's trust fund. Disbursements of such funds shall be on the authorization of the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families beginning July 1, 2012. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, such funds shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation shall be required to permit expenditure of such funds.

[ 2019 c 148 s 36; 2018 c 58 s 14; 2011 1st sp.s. c 32 s 5; 2011 c 171 s 9; 2005 c 53 s 4; 1987 c 351 s 5; 1984 c 261 s 3; 1982 c 4 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Rule-making authority—2019 c 148: See RCW 70.58A.901 and 70.58A.902.

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 32 s 5: "Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1, 2012." [ 2011 1st sp.s. c 32 s 17.]

Transition plan—Report to the legislature—2011 1st sp.s. c 32: See note following RCW 70.305.005.

Intent—Effective date—2011 c 171: See notes following RCW 4.24.210.

Legislative findings—1987 c 351: "The legislature finds that children are society's most valuable resource and that child abuse and neglect is a threat to the physical, mental, and emotional health of children. The legislature further finds that assisting community-based private nonprofit and public organizations, agencies, or school districts in identifying and establishing needed primary prevention programs will reduce the incidence of child abuse and neglect, and the necessity for costly subsequent intervention in family life by the state. Child abuse and neglect prevention programs can be most effectively and economically administered through the use of trained volunteers and the cooperative efforts of the communities, citizens, and the state. The legislature finds that the Washington council for prevention of child abuse is an effective counsel for reducing child abuse but limited resources have prevented the council from funding promising prevention concepts statewide.

It is the intent of the legislature to establish a cost-neutral revenue system for the children's trust fund which is designed to fund primary prevention programs and innovative prevention related activities such as research or public awareness campaigns. The fund shall be supported through revenue created by the sale of heirloom birth certificates. This concept has proven to be a cost-effective approach to funding child abuse prevention in the state of Oregon. The legislature believes that this is an innovative way of using private dollars to supplement our public dollars to reduce child abuse and neglect." [ 1987 c 351 s 1.]